Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1

Tennessee Preparatory School [Repealed]

37-2-101 — 37-2-114. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§37-2-101 —37-2-114, (Acts 1917, ch. 126, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 4433a; Code 1932, §§ 4663, 4664; Acts 1953, ch. 247, §§ 1-10, 12, 13 (Williams, §§ 4662.1-4662.7, 4662.9, 4662.10, 4662.12, 4662.13); 1967, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1967, ch. 35, § 1; 1972, ch. 469, § 3; 1973, ch. 308, § 1; 1974, ch. 536, § 1; 1981, ch. 251, §§ 1-4; 1982, ch. 621, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 37-301 — 37-308, 37-310 — 37-315), concerning the Tennessee Preparatory School, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 109, effective May 21, 1996.